North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 2. Powers and Duties of Department and Board of Transportation.
§ 136-18.01.
Consultation required for welcome and visitor centers.

The Department of Commerce and the Department of Transportation shall consult with the chairs of the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Department of Transportation, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Transportation, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, and the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources before beginning the design or construction of any new welcome center or visitor center buildings.

History.

2007-356, s. 1; 2017-57, s. 14.1(w).

§ 136-18.02.
Operation of electric vehicle charging stations at rest stops; report.

The Department of Transportation may operate an electric vehicle charging station at State-owned rest stops along the highways only if all of the following conditions are met:

The electric vehicle charging station is accessible by the public.

The Department has developed a mechanism to charge the user of the electric vehicle charging station a fee in order to recover the cost of electricity consumed, the cost of processing the user fee, and a proportionate cost of the operation and maintenance of the electric vehicle charging station.

If the cost of the electricity consumed at the electric vehicle charging stations cannot be calculated as provided by subsection (a) of this section, the Department shall develop an alternative mechanism, other than electricity metering, to recover the cost of the electricity consumed at the vehicle charging station.

The Department may consult with other State agencies and industry representatives in order to develop the mechanisms for cost recovery required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

Beginning January 1, 2014, and annually thereafter, the Department of Transportation shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy, the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, the House Appropriations Subcommittee on Transportation, and the Senate Appropriations Subcommittee on Department of Transportation on the implementation of this section.

History.

2012-186, s. 2.

§ 136-18.03.
Outside counsel.

Intent. — It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Department of Transportation exercise the authority granted by this section to maximize operational and project delivery benefits attributed to the avoidance or successful defense of litigation.

Authorization. — The Department of Transportation may engage the services of private counsel with the pertinent expertise to provide legal services related to any project undertaken by the Department. The Department shall supervise and manage the private counsel engaged under this section and, excluding legal services related to workers’ compensation claims brought by Department employees, shall not be required to obtain written permission or approval from the Attorney General under

G.S. 114-2.3

. G.S. 147-17(c1) and

G.S. 114-2.3

(d) do not apply to this section.

Performance Metrics. — The Department shall develop performance metrics to evaluate its utilization of in-house counsel and private counsel, to include the following:

A summary of new matters opened by legal area.

Case cycle times.

Resolution of cases.

A comparison of in-house costs to billable rates for private counsel.

The process for procurement for legal services.

Report. — The Department shall provide a semiannual report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Joint Legislative Justice and Public Safety Oversight Committee on the performance metrics set forth in subsection (c) of this section.

History.

2015-241, s. 29.8(d); 2017-57, s. 6.7(c).

§ 136-18.04.
Product Evaluation Program.

The Product Evaluation Program, or any successor program operated by the Department of Transportation to review and approve or disapprove new and innovative technologies and products for use by the Department, shall complete its evaluation of a technology or product within one year from the date that the technology or product was submitted for evaluation. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the Product Evaluation Program or any successor program to review all technologies and products submitted to the Product Evaluation Program or any successor program.

History.

2015-241, s. 29.11(c).

§ 136-18.05.
Establishment of “DOT Report” Program.

Intent. — It is the intent of the General Assembly that North Carolina’s reputation as the “Good Roads State” is restored, which requires a partnership between the Governor, the Department of Transportation, the General Assembly, and all North Carolina citizens. Further, the General Assembly finds that improving the condition of North Carolina’s roads requires increased oversight, accountability, innovation, and efficiency. It is the belief of the General Assembly that, through increased transparency and responsiveness to the public, the condition of the roads in this State will be the best in the nation within 10 years.

Establishment and Components. — To achieve the intent set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the Department shall establish and implement the “DOT Report” Program (Program). The Program shall include the following components:

Responsiveness. — The Department shall structure the Program to gather citizen input and shall commit to quickly addressing structural problems and other road hazards on State-maintained roads. Citizens may report potholes, drainage issues, culvert blockages, guardrail repairs, damaged or missing signs, malfunctioning traffic lights, highway debris, or shoulder damage to the Department of Transportation by calling a toll-free telephone number designated by the Department or submitting an online work request through a Web site link designated by the Department. Beginning January 1, 2016, upon receiving a citizen report in accordance with this subdivision, the Department shall either address the reported problem or identify a solution to the reported problem. Excluding potholes, which shall be repaired within two business days of the date the report is received, the Department of Transportation shall properly address (i) safety-related citizen reports no later than 10 business days after the date the report is received and (ii) non-safety-related citizen reports no later than 15 business days after the date the report is received. The Department shall determine, in its discretion, whether a citizen report is safety-related or non-safety-related. The Department shall transmit information received about potholes or other problems on roads not maintained by the State to the appropriate locality within two business days of receiving the citizen report. The Department shall post a monthly report to the Department’s performance dashboard Web site on the number of citizen reports received under this subdivision for the month immediately preceding the monthly report, the number of citizen reports fully addressed within the time frames set forth in this subdivision for the month immediately preceding the monthly report, the number of citizen reports addressed outside of the time frames set forth in this subdivision for the month immediately preceding the monthly report, and the number of citizen reports not fully addressed for the month immediately preceding the report.

(1a)

Efficiency. —

The Department shall adopt procedures in all stages of the construction process to streamline project delivery, including consolidating environmental review processes, expediting multiagency reviews, accelerating right-of-way acquisitions, and pursuing design build and other processes to collapse project stages. By December 1, 2015, the Department shall establish a baseline unit pricing structure for transportation goods used in highway maintenance and construction projects and set annual targets for three years based on its unit pricing. In forming the baseline unit prices and future targets, the Department shall collect data from each Highway Division on its expenditures on transportation goods during the 2015-2016 fiscal year. Beginning January 1, 2016, no Highway Division shall exceed a ten percent (10%) variance over a baseline unit price set for that year in accordance with this subdivision. The Department of Transportation shall institute annual tracking to monitor pricing variances. The ten percent (10%) maximum variance set under this subdivision is intended to account for regional differences requiring varying product mixes. If a Highway Division exceeds the unit pricing threshold, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Transportation, and the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on the Department of Transportation no later than the fifteenth day of February following the end of the calendar year on why the variance occurred and what steps are being taken to bring the Highway Division back into compliance. In order to drive savings, unit pricing may be reduced annually as efficiencies are achieved.

Performance. — Beginning December 1, 2015, the Secretary of the Department of Transportation shall conduct an annual job satisfaction survey of all Department personnel that shall address relationships among all levels of leadership, work environment, issues impacting job performance, and leadership performance in creating the dynamic work environment necessary to meet new performance outcomes. In addition, the Department shall conduct an annual survey of North Carolina citizens to measure the level of citizen satisfaction with the condition of the roads and highways of this State. Within 30 days of compiling the information received from surveys conducted in accordance with this subdivision, the results of these surveys shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division.

Quarterly Cost Escalation Report. — Within 30 days of the end of each quarter, the Department of Transportation shall submit to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and to the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly a quarterly report containing summaries by month of a report for resurfacing projects and a report for contracts let centrally and by the highway divisions. Both reports shall contain all of the following information itemized by highway division:

Total number of projects.

Number of awarded projects.

Number of bidders.

Average number of bidders per project.

Number of single bids.

Number of contracts not awarded.

Total cost estimate for projects.

Total low bid amount.

Percentage above or below estimate.

History.

2015-241, s. 29.14(a); 2017-57, s. 35.16(a); 2018-5, s. 34.10(a); 2018-74, s. 2(a).

§ 136-18.06.
Public Street Information Database.

The Department shall compile a readily available “Public Street Information Database” and place it in operation on or before January 1, 2020. The information shall convey the status of roads within the State, and it shall be updated at least monthly, except as provided in subdivision (1) of this section. The data shall reside on any existing database system chosen by the Department for this purpose, including a geographic information system (GIS) mapping system. The system chosen shall convey clear and concise information regarding the status of roads to the public. The data shall be available to the public in either graphic or tabular format, or both. The status of roads to be conveyed shall be:

Federally owned, updated as often and with as much information as the State is provided from the federal government.

State-maintained with a State road number assigned.

State-owned with a State road number assigned.

History.

2019-156, s. 1.

§ 136-18.07.
Subdivision Roads Manual.

The Department shall update its Subdivision Roads Minimum Construction Standards Manual and any related pavement or other policies by July 1, 2020, and regularly thereafter, to accurately reflect current federal and State law and applicable judicial decisions. The Department shall report all updates to the Manual to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee.

History.

2019-156, s. 2.

§ 136-18.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-29, s. 1.

§ 136-18.2.
Seed planted by Department of Transportation to be approved by Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

The Department of Transportation shall not cause any seed to be planted on or along any highway or road right-of-way unless and until such seed has been approved by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services as provided for in the rules and regulations of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for such seed.

History.

1957, c. 1002; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1997-261, s. 88.

§ 136-18.3.
Location of garbage collection containers by counties and municipalities.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to issue permits to counties and municipalities for the location of containers on rights-of-way of state-maintained highways for the collection of garbage. Such containers may be located on highway rights-of-way only when authorized in writing by the Chief Engineer in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation. Such rules and regulations shall take into consideration the safety of travelers on the highway and the elimination of unsightly conditions and health hazards. Such containers shall not be located on fully controlled-access highways.

The provisions of

G.S. 14-399

, which make it a misdemeanor to place garbage on highway rights-of-way, shall not apply to persons placing garbage in containers in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation.

The written authority granted by the Department of Transportation shall be no guarantee that the State system highway rights-of-way on which the containers are authorized to be located is owned by the Department of Transportation, and the issuance of such written authority shall be granted only when the county or municipality certifies that written permission to locate the refuse container has been obtained from the owner of the underlying fee if the owner can be determined and located.

Whenever any municipality or county fails to comply with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation or whenever they fail or refuse to comply with any order of the Department of Transportation for the removal or change in the location of a container, then the permit of such county or municipality shall be revoked. The location of such garbage containers on highway rights-of-way after such order for removal or change is unauthorized and illegal; the Department of Transportation shall have the authority to remove such unauthorized or illegal containers and charge the expense of such removal to the county or municipality failing to comply with the order of the Department of Transportation.

History.

1973, c. 1381; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 2012-85, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-85, s. 5, effective June 26, 2012, substituted “Chief Engineer” for “State Highway Administrator” in the second sentence in subsection (a).

§ 136-18.3A.
Wireless communications infrastructure.

The definitions set forth in

G.S. 160D-931

shall apply to this section.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to issue permits to wireless providers for the collocation of wireless facilities and the construction, operation, modification, or maintenance of utility poles, wireless support structures, conduit, cable, and related appurtenances and facilities for the provision of wireless services along, across, upon, or under the rights-of-way of State-maintained highways. The permits and included requirements shall be issued and administered in a reasonable and nondiscriminatory manner.

The Department of Transportation shall take action to approve or deny a permit application for collocation of a small wireless facility under this section within a reasonable period of time of receiving the application from a wireless provider.

The collocation of small wireless facilities and the construction, operation, modification, or maintenance of utility poles, wireless support structures, conduit, cable, and related appurtenances and facilities for the provision of small wireless facilities along, across, upon, or under the rights-of-way of State-maintained highways shall be subject to all of the following requirements:

The structures and facilities shall not obstruct or hinder the usual travel or public safety on any rights-of-way of State-maintained highways or obstruct the legal use of such rights-of-way of State-maintained highways by other utilities.

Each new or modified utility pole and wireless support structure installed in the right-of-way of State-maintained highways shall not exceed the greater of (i) 10 feet in height above the height of the tallest existing utility pole, other than a utility pole supporting only wireless facilities, in place as of July 1, 2017, located within 500 feet of the new pole in the same rights-of-way or (ii) 50 feet above ground level.

Each new small wireless facility in the right-of-way shall not extend (i) more than 10 feet above an existing utility pole, other than a utility pole supporting only wireless facilities, or wireless support structure in place as of July 1, 2017, or (ii) above the height permitted for a new utility pole or wireless support structure under subdivision (2) of this section.

History.

2017-159, s. 3(b); 2019-111, s. 2.5(p); 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 136-18.4.
Provision and marking of “pull-off ” areas.

The Department of Transportation is hereby authorized and directed (i) to provide as needed within its right-of-way, adjacent to long sections of two-lane primary highway having a steep uphill grade or numerous curves, areas on which buses, trucks and other slow-moving vehicles can pull over so that faster moving traffic may proceed unimpeded and (ii) to erect appropriate and adequate signs along such sections of highway and at the pull-off areas. A driver of a truck, bus, or other slow-moving vehicle who fails to use an area so provided and thereby impedes faster moving traffic following his vehicle shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1975, c. 704; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1993, c. 539, s. 978; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 136-18.5.
Wesley D. Webster Highway.

State Highway 704 shall be known as the “Wesley D. Webster Highway”.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 974.

§ 136-18.5A.
Purple Heart Memorial Highway.

Interstate Highway 95 in North Carolina is designated as the “Purple Heart Memorial Highway” to pay tribute to the many North Carolinians who have been awarded the Purple Heart medal after being wounded or killed in action against the enemy.

History.

2002-86, s. 2(a).

§ 136-18.5B.
Dale Earnhardt Highway.

The Board of Transportation shall designate State Highway 136 in Iredell and Cabarrus counties as State Highway 3, which shall be known as the “Dale Earnhardt Highway”.

History.

2002-170, s. 4.

§ 136-18.5C.
The U.S. Marine Corps Highway: Home of Carolina-Based Marines since 1941.

U.S. Highway 17 running between the Town of Holly Ridge and the Town of Edenton, and the portion of U.S. Highway 70 running between the intersection of U.S. Highway 70 and N.C. Highway 101 near Cherry Point Marine Corps Air Station and the intersection of U.S. Highway 70 and U.S. Highway 17 is designated as “The U.S. Marine Corps Highway: Home of Carolina-Based Marines since 1941” in light of the historical contributions of the United States Marine Corps.

History.

2009-198, s. 1.

§ 136-18.6.
Cutting down trees.

Except in the process of an authorized construction, maintenance or safety project, the Department shall not cut down trees unless:

The trees pose a potential danger to persons or property; or

The cutting down of the trees is approved by the appropriate District Engineer.

History.

1989, c. 63, s. 1.

§ 136-18.7.
Fees.

The fee for a selective vegetation removal permit issued pursuant to G.S. 136-18(5), (7), and (9) is two hundred dollars ($200.00).

History.

1999-404, s. 5.

§ 136-19.
Acquisition of land and deposits of materials; condemnation proceedings; federal parkways.

The Department of Transportation is vested with the power to acquire either in the nature of an appropriate easement or in fee simple such rights-of-way and title to such land, gravel, gravel beds or bars, sand, sand beds or bars, rock, stone, boulders, quarries, or quarry beds, lime or other earth or mineral deposits or formations, and such standing timber as it may deem necessary and suitable for transportation infrastructure construction, including road construction, maintenance, and repair, and the necessary approaches and ways through, and a sufficient amount of land surrounding and adjacent thereto, as it may determine to enable it to properly prosecute the work, by purchase, donation, or condemnation, in the manner hereinafter set out. If the Department of Transportation acquires by purchase, donation, or condemnation part of a tract of land in fee simple for highway right-of-way as authorized by this section and the Department of Transportation later determines that the property acquired for transportation infrastructure, including highway right-of-way, or a part of that property, is no longer needed for infrastructure right-of-way, then the Department shall give first consideration to any offer to purchase the property made by the former owner. The Department may refuse any offer that is less than the current market value of the property, as determined by the Department. Unless the Department acquired an entire lot, block, or tract of land belonging to the former owner, the former owner must own the remainder of the lot, block, or tract of land from which the property was acquired to receive first consideration by the Department of their offer to purchase the property.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), if the Department acquires the property by condemnation and determines that the property or a part of that property is no longer needed for highway right-of-way or other transportation projects, the Department of Transportation may reconvey the property to the former owner upon payment by the former owner of the full price paid to the owner when the property was taken, the cost of any improvements, together with interest at the legal rate to the date when the decision was made to offer the return of the property. Unless the Department acquired an entire lot, block, or tract of land belonging to the former owner, the former owner must own the remainder of the lot, block, or tract of land from which the property was acquired to purchase the property pursuant to this subsection.

The requirements of this section for reconveying property to the former owner, regardless of whether such property was acquired by purchase, donation, or condemnation, shall not apply to property acquired outside the right-of-way as an “uneconomic remnant” or “residue”.

The Department of Transportation is also vested with the power to acquire such additional land alongside of the rights-of-way for transportation projects, including roads as in its opinion may be necessary and proper for the protection of the transportation projects, including roads and roadways, and such additional area as may be necessary as by it determined for approaches to and from such material and other requisite area as may be desired by it for working purposes. The Department of Transportation may, in its discretion, with the consent of the landowner, acquire in fee simple an entire lot, block or tract of land, if by so doing, the interest of the public will be best served, even though said entire lot, block or tract is not immediately needed for right-of-way purposes.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law or eminent domain powers of utility companies, utility membership corporations, municipalities, counties, entities created by political subdivisions, or any combination thereof, and in order to prevent undue delay of highway projects because of utility conflicts, the Department of Transportation may condemn or acquire property in fee or appropriate easements necessary to provide transportation project rights-of-way for the relocation of utilities when required in the construction, reconstruction, or rehabilitation of a State transportation project. The Department of Transportation shall also have the authority, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 136-19.5(a)

and (b), to, in its discretion, acquire rights-of-way necessary for the present or future placement of utilities as described in G.S. 136-18(2).

Whenever the Department of Transportation and the owner or owners of the lands, materials, and timber required by the Department of Transportation to carry on the work as herein provided for, are unable to agree as to the price thereof, the Department of Transportation is hereby vested with the power to condemn the lands, materials, and timber and in so doing the ways, means, methods, and procedure of Article 9 of this Chapter shall be used by it exclusively.

The Department of Transportation shall have the same authority, under the same provisions of law provided for construction of State transportation projects, for acquirement of all rights-of-way and easements necessary to comply with the rules and regulations of the United States government for the construction of federal parkways and entrance roads to federal parks in the State of North Carolina. The acquirement of a total of 125 acres per mile of said parkways, including roadway and recreational, and scenic areas on either side thereof, shall be deemed a reasonable area for said purpose. The right-of-way acquired or appropriated may, at the option of the Department of Transportation, be a fee-simple title. The said Department of Transportation is hereby authorized to convey such title so acquired to the United States government, or its appropriate agency, free and clear of all claims for compensation. All compensation contracted to be paid or legally assessed shall be a valid claim against the Department of Transportation, payable out of the State Highway Fund. Any conveyance to the United States Department of Interior of land acquired as provided by this section shall contain a provision whereby the State of North Carolina shall retain concurrent jurisdiction over the areas conveyed. The Governor is further authorized to grant concurrent jurisdiction to lands already conveyed to the United States Department of Interior for parkways and entrances to parkways.

The action of the Department of Transportation heretofore taken in the acquirement of areas for the Blue Ridge Parkway in accordance with the rules and regulations of the United States government is hereby ratified and approved and declared to be a reasonable exercise of the discretion vested in the said Department of Transportation in furtherance of the public interest.

When areas have been tentatively designated by the United States government to be included within a parkway, but the final survey necessary for the filing of maps as provided in this section has not yet been made, no person shall cut or remove any timber from said areas pending the filing of said maps after receiving notice from the Department of Transportation that such area is under investigation; and any property owner who suffers loss by reason of the restraint upon his right to use the said timber pending such investigation shall be entitled to recover compensation from the Department of Transportation for the temporary appropriation of his property, in the event the same is not finally included within the appropriated area, and the provisions of this section may be enforced under the same law now applicable for the adjustment of compensation in the acquirement of rights-of-way on other property by the Department of Transportation.

History.

1921, c. 2, s. 22; 1923, c. 160, s. 6; C.S., s. 3846(bb); 1931, c. 145, s. 23; 1933, c. 172, s. 17; 1935, c. 2; 1937, c. 42; 1949, c. 1115; 1953, c. 217; 1957, c. 65, s. 11; 1959, c. 1025, s. 1; cc. 1127, 1128; 1963, c. 638; 1971, c. 1105; 1973, c. 507, ss. 5, 11; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 962, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 979, s. 1; 2009-266, s. 7.

Cross References.

As to powers of the Department of Transportation, see

G.S. 136-18

.

As to institution of action and deposit in condemnation action, see

G.S. 136-103

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-266, s. 7, effective August 1, 2009, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, inserted “transportation infrastructure construction, including” near the middle, in the second sentence, inserted “transportation infrastructure, including” and substituted “infrastructure right-of-way” for “highway right-of-way” near the middle; in subsection (b), inserted “or other transportation projects” in the first sentence; in subsection (d), substituted “rights-of-way for transportation projects, including” for “rights-of-way or” and inserted “transportation projects, including” in the first sentence; in subsection (e), substituted “transportation project rights-of-way” for “highway rights-of-way” and “transportation project” for “highway project” in the first sentence; and, in subsection (g), substituted “transportation projects” for “highways” in the first sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the operation of this section in connection with Chapter 40, see 28 N.C.L. Rev. 403 (1950).

For case law survey on eminent domain, see 41 N.C.L. Rev. 471 (1963); 44 N.C.L. Rev. 941, 1003 (1966); 48 N.C.L. Rev. 767 (1970).

For note on public use in North Carolina, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 1142 (1966).

For article urging revision and recodification of North Carolina’s eminent domain laws, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 587 (1967).

§ 136-19.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 338, s. 1.

§ 136-19.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 733, s. 13.

§ 136-19.3.
Acquisition of buildings.

Where the right-of-way of a proposed highway or other transportation project necessitates the taking of a portion of a building or structure, the Department of Transportation may acquire, by condemnation or purchase, the entire building or structure, together with the right to enter upon the surrounding land for the purpose of removing said building or structure, upon a determination by the Department of Transportation based upon an affidavit of an independent real estate appraiser that the partial taking will substantially destroy the economic value or utility of the building or structure and (i) that an economy in the expenditure of public funds will be promoted thereby; or (ii) that it is not feasible to cut off a portion of the building without destroying the entire building; or (iii) that the convenience, safety or improvement of the transportation project will be promoted thereby; provided, nothing herein contained shall be deemed to give the Department of Transportation authority to condemn the underlying fee of the portion of any building or structure which lies outside the right-of-way of any existing or proposed transportation project, including a public road, street or highway.

History.

1965, c. 660; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 2009-266, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-266, s. 8, effective August 1, 2009, inserted “or other transportation project” near the beginning, substituted “transportation project” for “highway” in clause (iii), and inserted “transportation project, including a” near the end.

§ 136-19.4.
Registration of right-of-way plans.

A copy of the cover sheet and plan and profile sheets of the final right-of-way plans for all Department of Transportation projects, on those projects for which plans are prepared, under which right-of-way or other interest in real property is acquired or access is controlled shall be certified by the Department of Transportation to the register of deeds of the county or counties within which the project is located. The Department shall certify said plan sheets to the register of deeds within two weeks from their formal approval by the Board of Transportation.

The copy of the plans certified to the register of deeds shall consist of a Xerox, photographic, or other permanent copy, except for plans electronically transmitted pursuant to subsection (b1) of this section, and shall measure approximately 17 inches by 11 inches including no less than one and one-half inches binding space on the left-hand side.

(b1)

With the approval of the county in which the right-of-way plans are to be filed, the Department may transmit the plans electronically.

Notwithstanding any other provision in the law, upon receipt of said original certified copy of the right-of-way plans, the register of deeds shall record said right-of-way plans and place the same in a book maintained for that purpose, and the register of deeds shall maintain a cross-index to said right-of-way plans by number of road affected, if any, and by identification number. No probate before the clerk of the superior court shall be required.

If after the approval of said final right-of-way plans the Board of Transportation shall by resolution alter or amend said right-of-way or control of access, the Department of Transportation, within two weeks from the adoption by the Board of Transportation of said alteration or amendment, shall certify to the register of deeds in the county or counties within which the project is located a copy of the amended plan and profile sheets approved by the Board of Transportation and the register of deeds shall remove the original plan sheets and record the amended plan sheets in lieu thereof.

The register of deeds in each county shall collect a fee from the Department of Transportation for recording right-of-way plans and profile sheets in the amount set out in

G.S. 161-10

.

History.

1967, c. 228, s. 1; 1969, c. 80, s. 13; 1973, c. 507, ss. 5, 12-15; 1975, c. 716, s. 7; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1999-422, s. 1; 2000-68, s. 1; 2001-390, s. 6.

§ 136-19.4A.
Required surveying information in certain acquisition plans.

The Department of Transportation shall include in any plan prepared for the purpose of acquiring right-of-way, a permanent easement, or both, that depicts property lines, right-of-way lines, or permanent easements, a set of drawings that clearly identify design alignments, baseline control points, found property-related corner markers, and new right-of-way and permanent easement corner markers. Plans subject to the requirements of this section shall document the localized coordinates for each major control point along the design alignments. The coordinates and associated localization metadata shall be based upon, and tied to, the North Carolina State Plane Coordinate system and shall be clearly identified within the plans. All property corner markers found and surveyed shall be clearly identified within the plans in accordance with general surveying standards and procedures. Each property corner marker shall be accurately tied to the design alignment or the North Carolina State Plane Coordinate system, by either a system of bearings and distances or by station and offset.

History.

2017-137, s. 1; 2017-212, s. 1.3.

§ 136-19.5.
Utility right-of-way agreements.

Before the Department of Transportation acquires or proposes to acquire additional rights-of-way for the purpose of accommodating the installation of utilities as authorized by

G.S. 136-18

and

G.S. 136-19

, there shall first be voluntary agreements with the appropriate utilities regarding the acquisition and use of the particular right-of-way and requiring the payment to the Department of Transportation for or recapture of all of its costs associated with that acquisition, including the use of funds allocated to such acquisition. Such agreements may take into account the fact that more than one utility can make use of the right-of-way. No such agreement shall constitute a sale of the right-of-way and all such rights-of-way shall remain under the control of the Department of Transportation.

A prior agreement between the Department of Transportation and the affected utilities may be entered into but is not required when the acquisition of right-of-way is for the purpose of relocation of utilities due to construction, reconstruction, or rehabilitation of a State transportation project. The Department of Transportation shall notify the affected utility whose facilities are being relocated and the affected utility may choose not to participate in the proposed plan for right-of-way acquisition. The decision not to participate in the proposed plan of right-of-way acquisition shall not affect any other rights the utility may have as a result of the relocation of its lines or pipelines.

Whenever the Department of Transportation requires the relocation of utilities, including cable service as defined in

G.S. 105-164.3

, located in a right-of-way for which the utility owner contributed to the cost of acquisition, the Department of Transportation shall reimburse the utility owner for the cost of moving those utilities. The Department may, with the agreement of the utility owner, acquire a replacement right-of-way and assign the easement rights of the replacement right-of-way to the utility owner.

Any additional right-of-way obtained pursuant to this section which is part of a railroad right-of-way shall be returned to the railroad or its successor in interest when the Department of Transportation and the affected utilities agree that the additional right-of-way is no longer useful for utility purposes and the Department of Transportation determines that it is no longer useful for transportation purposes.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 962, s. 3; 2009-266, s. 9; 2017-10, s. 2.12(c); 2018-5, s. 34.14.